Missouri, session 2026, HB2888.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 537, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 537.1600, to read as follows:
537.1600. 1. No standalone cause of action for medical monitoring exists under
the laws of this state. Increased risk of disease, whether accompanied by physiological
or other changes in the human body, is not itself compensable through damages or any
other form of relief, regardless of the legal theory being asserted.
2. In any civil action, no defendant shall be required to pay damages or provide
any other type of legal, injunctive, or equitable relief for a plaintiff's future medical
surveillance, screening tests, or monitoring procedures unless the plaintiff proves, in
addition to the other requirements for the underlying cause of action, that:
(1) The future medical surveillance, screening tests, or monitoring procedures
sought are directly related to, and necessitated by, a presently existing and diagnosable
physical disease or injury of the plaintiff;
(2) The future medical surveillance, screening tests, or monitoring procedures
are distinct from the medical surveillance, screening tests, or monitoring procedures
recommended in the absence of the preexisting physical disease or injury and related
exposure; and
(3) The plaintiff's presently existing physical disease or injury was caused by the
defendant's tortious conduct.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2888 2
3. For purposes of subsection 2 of this section, the mere presence of a toxic
substance in the bloodstream shall not constitute a presently existing and diagnosable
physical disease or injury.
✔